District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.10

Registered office and registered agent required.

Repealed.

History

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 183, ch. 269, § 10
Sept. 10, 1992, D.C. Law 9-144, § 4(b), 39 DCR 4863
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-255, § 28(e), 44 DCR 1271
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-101.10.
1981 Ed., § 29-310.
1973 Ed., § 29-907.